North Dakota statutes. TITLE 12.1 Criminal Code
CHAPTER 12.1-23 Theft and Related Offenses
12.1-23-16.
Automated sales suppression device, zapper, or phantom-ware — Prohibition — Penalties.

For purposes of this section:

“Automated sales suppression device” or “zapper” means a software program accessed through any method which falsifies the electronic records, transaction data, or transaction reports of electronic cash registers and other point-of-sale systems.

“Electronic cash register” means a device that keeps a register or supporting documents through the use of an electronic device or computer system designed to record transaction data for the purpose of computing, compiling, or processing retail sales transaction data or transaction reports.

“Phantom-ware” means a hidden, preinstalled or installed at a later time, programming option embedded in the operating system of an electronic cash register or hardwired into the electronic cash register, which can be used to create a virtual second cash register or that can eliminate or manipulate transaction records that may be preserved in digital formats to represent the true or manipulated transaction data or reports in the electronic cash register and is intended to falsify the electronic records of an electronic cash register or other point-of-sale system.

“Transaction data” means items purchased by a customer, the price for each item, a taxability determination for each item, a segregated tax amount for each of the taxed items, the amount of cash or credit tendered, the net amount returned to the customer in change, the date and time of purchase, the name, address, and identification number of the vendor, and the receipt or invoice number of the transaction.

“Transaction report” means a report documenting sales, the tax collected, methods of payment, voided sales, or other information at an electronic cash register which is printed on cash register tape at the end of a day or shift, or a report documenting every transaction at an electronic cash register that is stored electronically.

It is unlawful to willfully sell, purchase, possess, install, transfer, manufacture, own, or use in this state, an automated sales suppression device, zapper, or phantom-ware.

Any person convicted of a violation under subsection 2 is guilty of a class B felony. Any person convicted of a second or subsequent violation of subsection 2 is guilty of a class A felony and also is subject to a civil penalty of not more than one hundred thousand dollars.

It is a defense to prosecution under this section that the person purchased, possessed, installed, transferred, owned, or used in this state, an automated sales suppression device, zapper, or phantom-ware for a legitimate purpose.

Any person violating subsection 2 is liable for all sales and use tax, income tax, or other tax under title 57, and any county or city sales and use tax imposed under sections 11-09.2-05 and 40-05.1-06, and associated penalties and interest due the state as the result of the fraudulent use of an automated sales suppression device, zapper, or phantom-ware. Any tax found to be due must be assessed at double the amount so determined.

The person shall forfeit all proceeds associated with the sale or use of an automated sales suppression device, zapper, or phantom-ware. The proceeds forfeited under this section must be deposited with the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund.

An automated sales suppression device, zapper, or phantom-ware, and the cash register or other device containing the device or the software, is contraband and subject to forfeiture in accordance with chapter 29-31.1.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 108, § 1.

12.1-23-17.
Unlawful skimming of credit, debit, or other electronic payment cards — Penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 108, § 2; repealed by 2019, ch. 111, § 4, effective August 1, 2019.

12.1-23-18.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Payment card” means a credit card, charge card, debit card, or any other card issued to an authorized card user which allows the user to obtain, purchase, or receive credit, money, goods, services, or anything else of value.

“Re-encoder” means an electronic device that places encoded information from the computer chip or magnetic strip or stripe of a payment card onto the computer chip or magnetic strip or stripe of a different payment card, driver’s license, or state-issued identification card, or any electronic medium that allows an authorized transaction to occur.

“Scanning device” means a scanner, reader, or any other electronic device used to access, read, scan, obtain, memorize, or store, information encoded on a computer chip or magnetic strip or stripe of a payment card, driver’s license, or state-issued identification card.

“Skimmer” means an electronic, photographic, visual imaging, recording, or other device capable of accessing, reading, recording, capturing, copying, imaging, scanning, reproducing, or storing in any manner the financial information contained on a payment card or encoded on a computer chip or magnetic strip or stripe of a payment card.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 111, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

12.1-23-19.
Use and possession of re-encoders and scanning devices — Penalty.

An individual is guilty of a class B felony if the individual uses or attempts to use a skimmer, re-encoder, or a scanning device to obtain information from a payment card, driver’s license, or state-issued identification card without the permission of the authorized card user of the card from which the information is being skimmed, re-encoded, or scanned. An individual convicted of a second or subsequent violation of this subsection is guilty of a class A felony and also is subject to a civil penalty of not more than one hundred thousand dollars.

An individual is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if the individual owns or possess a skimmer, re-encoder, or scanning device with the intent to commit, aid, or abet any unlawful activity.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 111, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.